Washington statutes.
RCW 42.36.100

Judicial restriction of doctrine not prohibited—Construction of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits the restriction or elimination of the appearance of fairness doctrine by the appellate courts. Nothing in this chapter may be construed to expand the appearance of fairness doctrine.

[ 1982 c 229 s 10.]